California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) No fewer than 30 days before the close of escrow, hold a meeting where the public may make comments regarding a specific transaction or transactions regarding the real property under consideration by the department.

(i) The meeting may take place via teleconference.

(ii) The meeting may take place at an otherwise planned public meeting hosted by the department.

(C) No fewer than 10 days before the meeting described in subparagraph (B), notify the public of the meeting by posting information about the meeting on the department’s internet website on a webpage visible to the public and
 notifying all owners of record of adjacent parcels of land.

(i) The department shall make a good faith effort to notify owners of record identified pursuant to this subparagraph by using existing distribution lists or available contact information. Owners of record may be contacted electronically or by mail.

(ii) In all circumstances, the meeting notice shall clearly state the specific real property transaction on which the public may comment at the meeting and an explanation of the proposed use of the land by the department.

(2) With respect to real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 15853 of the Government Code, for purposes of the notification in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the following:

(A) The department shall also
 make a good faith effort to locate current contact information for all adjacent landowners displaced due to the 2020 CZU Lightning Complex Fire.

(B) The department may consult with the relevant county agencies or officials to locate contact information for landowners.

(3) Subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) shall not apply to properties that, on all boundaries, are adjacent to state-owned lands.

(4) (A) On or before January 1, 2028, and on or before January 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the department’s use of authority granted under subdivision (c) of Section 15853 of, and paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 11005 of, the Government Code for the
 acquisition without the State Public Works Board or without the approval of the Director of General Services, as applicable, of fee title or any lesser right or interest in real property by the department.

(B) A report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall, for the reporting period, include, but not be limited to, a summary of each transaction conducted, any associated costs or savings as a result of the transaction, and duration of the real estate transaction.

(d) This
 section does not apply to any real property to be acquired by grant, gift, devise, or bequest.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 7.5.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 775.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.1.

(a) (1) Before submitting a proposal pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5006, for an appropriation for the acquisition of real property in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in value for any state park system project, the department shall hold a public meeting within the county in which the proposed project is located at which interested members of the public may comment on the proposed project. Notice of the meeting shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within that county.

(2) (A) The department shall provide written notice of its
 intent to acquire the real property to the city or county, or both, having jurisdiction over the property, to the members of the Legislature who are the Chair and Vice Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the chair of the budget subcommittee in each house having jurisdiction over resources, the chair in each house of the appropriate legislative policy committee, and the legislators within whose district the property proposed for acquisition is located, as early as possible in the acquisition process, but not less than 90 days from the date of acquisition. Within 30 days of receiving written notice of the proposed acquisition, a member of the city council or board of supervisors of the respective city or county, or a Member of the Legislature who has been notified pursuant to this subparagraph, may request that the department hold a public meeting regarding the acquisition of the property,
 if the acquisition is between five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(B) The written notice of intent shall describe any potential impact that the acquisition may have on the department’s efforts to provide park and recreational opportunities.

(b) With respect to real property in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) that is not proposed to be acquired pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5006, the department shall hold a public meeting within the county in which the real property is located, at which interested members of the public may comment on the proposed acquisition. Notice of the meeting shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The department shall provide written notice of
 its intent to acquire the real property to the city or county, or both, having jurisdiction over the property, as early as possible in the acquisition process.

(c) This section does not apply to any real property to be acquired by grant, gift, devise, or bequest.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2033.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7.5) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 8.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.10.

(a) The department shall notify the State Parks and Recreation Commission of any proposed development that may substantially impact the historical, cultural, or recreational significance of the Colonel Allensworth State Historic Park. Upon receipt of this notification, the commission shall hold a duly noticed public hearing to receive public input regarding the potential impacts of the proposed development of the park. Following the public hearing, the commission
 shall submit, in writing, to the department a summary of its conclusions on potential park impacts that may be caused by the proposed development for transmission by the department to the appropriate local government entities.

(b) The department, in consultation with the State Office of Historic Preservation, shall study the feasibility of recommending that Colonel Allensworth State Historic Park be considered for designation as a National Historic Landmark.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.   (AB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.15.

The department may acquire real property by donation or purchase that is subject to a conservation easement, deed restriction, or other limitation, if the director determines that the conservation easement, deed restriction, or other limitation is consistent with and promotes the purposes for which the property is to be acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.2.

The Director of Parks and Recreation with the consent of the Director of Finance may acquire by gift, purchase or condemnation any interest, including options, in those properties known as Aptos Forest, Santa Cruz County, more particularly described in that deed from Agnes K. Marks, et al., to the Nature Conservancy, a nonprofit corporation of District of Columbia, recorded August 3, 1962 in Book 1487, page 11, Official Records of Santa Cruz County, upon such terms and conditions he may see fit for proper development, use and control of the area as a state park.

When such properties are so acquired, they shall be included in the state
 park system under the exclusive control of the officers administering the state park system, provided that the Director of Parks and Recreation shall have no authority, under other provisions of law except by permission of the Legislature, to grant, give, or suffer easements, permits, leases, rights, or rights-of-way therein other than those necessary for the orderly development, use, and control of the park. Where under other provisions of law park property may be taken by eminent domain, it shall not be deemed to include any part or interest in the above-described property except by specific permission of the Legislature.

Because of the uniqueness of the proposed park and the very generous gifts of the grantor in establishing this large state park to be preserved for posterity and notwithstanding restrictions hereinabove enumerated the Director of Parks and Recreation, with the consent of the Director of Finance, may within the Hinkley Basin Unit, some 2,500
 acres, more or less, more particularly described as those lands deeded by the Santa Cruz County Title Company, a corporation, and Alzoe K. Marks, wife of Andrew P. Marks, to Agnes K. Marks, Herman H. Marks, and Andrew P. Marks, recorded June 13, 1951, Volume 827, page 66, in the Offical Records of the County of Santa Cruz, lease to the grantor his heirs and assigns the right to explore for, extract, and remove oil and gas and hydrocarbons including the right to disturb the surface under such terms and conditions as he may prescribe. He may with the consent of the Director of Finance issue permits for access to any drill site as may be selected including easements for power, telephone, water, and pipe lines which are to be used exclusively by lessee in his exploration and extraction for oil, gas, and hydrocarbons and by the State as suits their needs for park purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1418.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.25.

The Director of Parks and Recreation is authorized to convey and grant to the County of Santa Cruz, for a site for a dam and reservoir in Aptos Creek, that portion hereinafter described of those properties known as Aptos Forest, Santa Cruz County, more particularly described in that deed from Agnes K. Marks, et al., to the State of California recorded November 14, 1963 in Book 1579, page 60, Official Records of Santa Cruz County and those properties known as Timothy-Hopkins, Santa Cruz County, more particularly described in that deed from Agnes K. Marks, et al., to the State of California recorded November 14, 1963 in Book 1579, page 35, Official Records of Santa Cruz County,
 upon such terms and conditions he may determine are in the best interest of the state; provided, however, that there be no restriction at the time of such conveyance and grant that the properties described herein known as Aptos Forest and Timothy-Hopkins, or any part thereof, which will cause a reversion of such properties to the former owners or heirs.

The property authorized to be conveyed or granted is described as follows:

Beginning at the intersection of the Mt. Diablo Meridian and the Southerly line of Township 10 South as shown on the United States Geological Survey Map (USGS) entitled “Laurel, California, 1955”; thence from the said point of beginning South 46° 00´ East 1050 feet; thence North 2° 30´ East 4100 feet; thence North 35° 30´ West 780 feet; thence North 89° 15´ East 630 feet; thence North 24° 00´ East 3530 feet; thence North 5° 00´ West 800 feet; thence North 85° 00´ East 130 feet; thence South 24° 45´
 East 970 feet; thence North 79° 00´ East 1540 feet; thence South 11° 00´ East 400 feet; thence South 73° 00´ West 1320 feet; thence South 23° 30´ West 2750 feet; thence South 86° 00´ East 500 feet; thence South 31° 45´ West 1175 feet; thence South 57° 00´ East 420 feet; thence South 33° 15´ West 920 feet; thence South 38° 15´ East 770 feet; thence South 36° 15´ West 900 feet; thence South 14° 45´ East 1340 feet; thence South 85° 15´ East 490 feet; thence South 35° 00´ West 1610 feet to a point on the Southerly Grant Boundary as shown on said map; thence along said Grant Boundary North 72° 00´ West 1600 feet thence leaving said Grant Boundary North 31° 00´ West 1620 feet; thence North 64° 00´ East 380 feet; thence South 46° 00´ East 270 feet to the point of beginning containing approximately 306 acres of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.3.

The department shall acquire sites for wayside campgrounds adjacent to the Westside Freeway, State Highway Route 5. The following general vicinities shall be given first consideration:

(a) Kern River.

(b) South of Kettleman City.

(c) Mercy Springs Road.

(d) Orestimba Creek.

(e) San Joaquin River near Mossdale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 721.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.4.

(a) The department may acquire, on behalf of the state, a fee or lesser interest in real and personal property located near Hollister in San Benito County for the state park system. If the property is leased, the lease shall be for such term and for such consideration as is mutually agreed upon by and between the director and the lessor, and with the rental to be paid by the department. Any interest acquired pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). With respect to lands subject to the grantor’s
 reservation of oil and gas and mineral rights, the proviso contained in Section 5019 shall not apply.

(b) The department shall carry out a program in that unit of development, maintenance, administration, and conservation of trails and areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles and for other related state park system purposes. Areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles shall be administered pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

Any fees, rentals, or other returns collected by the department in its administration of the unit shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.41.

The department may enter into agreements with the Department of Water Resources and the Department of Fish and Game to plan, develop, and administer real and personal property located in the vicinity of Oroville. The department shall carry out a program in that unit of development, maintenance, administration, and conservation of trails and areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles. Areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles shall be administered pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

Any fees, rentals, or other returns collected by the department in its
 administration of the unit shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.42.

(a) On or before February 1, 2002, the director shall establish the Cornfield State Park Advisory Committee, which shall be responsible for assisting the department, in an advisory capacity, to plan for interim and permanent land uses and facilities through the general planning process for the Cornfield site. The director shall terminate the advisory committee after the adoption of a general plan for the state park.

(b) The director shall convene and appoint the advisory
 committee. The members of the committee shall be selected by the director, who shall include, in the advisory committee, representatives from entities, including, but not limited to, local, state, and federal agencies, environmental, historic preservation, and cultural organizations, museums, educational institutions and organizations, individuals and private sector entities, and community-based organizations, including Asian-Pacific Americans, Chinese Americans, Latino community organizations, and other interested ethnic groups.

(c) The department shall take all of the following actions with respect to the development of a state park at the Cornfield site:

(1) Coordinate the implementation of the Cornfield rail yards project, considering recommendations for uses and development from the advisory committee.

(2) Survey statewide and community preferences in a range of park services appropriate for urban state park settings, as assisted by the advisory committee.

(3) Seek input and cooperate with local, state, and federal agencies, environmental, recreational, historic preservation and cultural organizations, museums, educational institutions and organizations, individuals and private sector entities, and community-based organizations, as appropriate, that are interested in the use or development of park and recreational facilities and programs for public benefit at the state park proposed to be located at the “Cornfield” rail yards, including the special needs of children, youths, senior citizens, and persons with disabilities.

(d) The advisory committee shall identify and recommend to the director, not later than 12 months after the date of acquisition of a fee title to
 the Cornfield site, priorities for long-range plans for the site that meet the needs of Californians and the general public, including park and recreational facilities and programs serving residents within communities surrounding the Cornfield rail yards in central Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 379, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services may acquire, on behalf of the state, a fee or lesser interest in such real and personal property located in the vicinity of Ocotillo Wells in San Diego County as is designated in writing to the Director of General Services by the Director of Parks and Recreation. If the property is leased, the lease shall be for such term and for such consideration as is mutually agreed upon by and between the Director of General Services and the lessor, and with the rental to be paid by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) Prior to making any acquisition:

(1) The Director of Parks and Recreation shall recommend to the State Park and Recreation Commission his designation of lands presently owned by the department to be included in the vehicular recreation area provided in subdivision (d), and no acquisition may be made unless and until the commission has concurred in that designation.

(2) The director shall conduct at least one public hearing in San Diego County regarding the designation of lands presently owned by the department to be included in the vehicular recreation area. The director shall consider and be guided by testimony presented at the hearing.

(c) Any interest acquired pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law
 (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The proviso in Section 5019 shall not apply to any property acquired pursuant to this section that is subject to a reservation of oil and mineral rights if the Director of Parks and Recreation finds that the proposed prospecting or extraction of oil and minerals will not unreasonably interfere with the use of the property or adjoining property for recreation and if the grantor or lessor of the surface of the property, if other than the state or the holder of such a reservation, consents to the proposed prospecting or extraction.

(d) Upon acquisition of the interest, the Director of General Services shall forthwith transfer the interest to the jurisdiction of the department, which shall administer the property as a unit of the state park system. The department shall carry out a program in that unit of development, maintenance, administration, and
 conservation of trails and areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles and for other related state park system purposes. Areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles shall be administered pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

(e) Any fees, rentals, or other returns collected by the department in its administration of the unit shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund.

(f) The Director of Parks and Recreation shall review, and report annually to the State Park and Recreation Commission regarding, the development, maintenance, administration, and public usage of the vehicular recreation area and its success, effects on the environment, and appropriateness as a unit of the state park system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.47.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services may acquire, on behalf of the state, a fee or lesser right or interest in such real and personal property in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura located in the vicinity of Gorman and commonly known as Hungry Valley as is designated in writing by the Director of Parks and Recreation to the Director of General Services. If the property is leased, the lease shall be for such term and for such consideration as is mutually agreed upon by and between the Director of General Services and the lessor, and consented to by the Director of Parks and Recreation,
 and with rent to be paid by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) Any interest in property acquired pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The proviso in Section 5019 shall not apply to any property acquired pursuant to this section that is subject to a reservation of oil and mineral rights if the Director of Parks and Recreation finds that the proposed prospecting or extraction of oil and minerals will not unreasonably interfere with the use of the property or adjoining property for recreation and if the grantor or lessor of the surface of the property, if other than the state or the holder of such a reservation, consents to the proposed prospecting or extraction.

(c) Upon acquisition of the property, the Director of General
 Services shall transfer jurisdiction over the property to the Department of Parks and Recreation, which shall administer the property as a unit of the state park system. The 51st District Agricultural Association may propose a name for the unit. The department shall carry out a program in that unit of planning, development, construction, maintenance, administration, and conservation of trails and areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles and for other related purposes of the state park system. Areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles shall be administered pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01). The 51st District Agricultural Association may use the land and facilities within the unit for a fair oriented to off-highway vehicles for not more than 10 days each year if the Director of Parks and Recreation approves that use. The director may impose such terms and conditions upon such use as the director deems necessary and proper. The dates of that use shall be
 selected each year prior to January 1 and shall be subject to the approval of the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(d) If the Director of General Services determines that it is necessary, in order to purchase the property, to offer to the person from whom it is being purchased an option to lease back all or part of the property, the director may make such an offer if the Director of Parks and Recreation determines at the time of the purchase that the property is not then needed for the purposes of the state park system and will not be needed for the term of the lease thus offered. At any time after the option expires, the Director of General Services may offer, under competitive bidding procedures, all or part of the property for lease if the Director of Parks and Recreation determines at that time it is not then needed for the purposes of the state park system and will not be needed for the term of the lease to be offered. Any lease entered
 into pursuant to this section shall be subject to Section 15862 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 15863 of the Government Code, all rent accruing from any such lease after jurisdiction over the property is transferred to the Department of Parks and Recreation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5090.61. 

(e) Any fees or other returns collected by the department in its administration of the unit shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5090.61.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.48.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services may acquire, on behalf of the state, a fee or lesser right or interest in real and personal property in the Counties of Alameda and San Joaquin located approximately 10 miles east of the City of Livermore and commonly known as the Carnegie Cycle Park. If the property is leased, the lease shall be for the term and for the consideration that is mutually agreed upon by and between the Director of General Services and the lessor, and consented to by the Director
 of Parks and Recreation, and with rent to be paid by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) Any interest in property acquired pursuant to this section shall be subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) Upon acquisition of the property, the Director of General Services shall transfer jurisdiction over the property to the Department of Parks and Recreation, which shall administer the property as a unit of the state park system. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall carry out a program in that unit of planning, development, construction, maintenance, administration, and conservation of trails and areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles and for other related purposes of the state park system. Areas for the recreational use of off-highway vehicles shall be
 administered pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

(d) The Director of General Services may offer, under competitive bidding procedures, all or part of the property for lease if the Director of Parks and Recreation determines at that time it is not then needed for the purposes of the state park system and will not be needed for the term of the lease to be offered. Any lease entered into pursuant to this section shall be subject to Section 15862 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 15863 of the Government Code, all rent accruing from that lease after jurisdiction over the property is transferred to the Department of Parks and Recreation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5090.61.

(e) Any fees or other returns collected by the Department of Parks and Recreation in its administration of the unit referred to in subdivision (c) shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Fund and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5090.61.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 565.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.49.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the California State Mining and Mineral Museum located in the City of Mariposa, including all assets, exhibits, and materials, shall be transferred from the Department of Conservation to the Department of Parks and Recreation for ownership and operation in accordance with the Department of Parks and Recreation’s rules, regulations, and guidelines regarding ownership of state parks. All proceeds from the operation of the museum shall accrue to the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 66, Sec. 7.   Effective July 6, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.5.

The department may lease any interest in real or personal property that the department deems necessary or proper for the extension, improvement, or development of the state park system. A lease described in this section shall require the consent of the Department of General Services, unless consent is waived by the Department of General Services. Payment from state money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) a year shall not be made pursuant to any such lease unless money equal to or exceeding one-half of the excess over one thousand dollars ($1,000) is made available for expenditure by the state for this purpose by some person, corporation, public district, municipality or political subdivision other than the state, or by the United States or a federal agency.
 A lease shall not be executed under this section until the department has first consulted with the planning commission of the county in which the department proposes to lease lands for park or recreational purposes. This section shall not apply when the Department of General Services leases land for the use of the Department of Parks and Recreation under Section 14669 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 9.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.6.

The department, with the approval of the Administrator of the Resources Agency and the Department of Finance, is authorized to cooperate and participate with the federal government pursuant to Public Law 89-161 in the development of recreation facilities, or with the approval of the Department of Fish and Game, fish and wildlife enhancement facilities, or both, at Auburn Dam and Reservoir, Folsom Dam and Reservoir, Nimbus Dam and Lake Natomas, and County Line Dam and Reservoir, and stream areas in the immediate vicinity of these facilities.

The department, with the approval of the Administrator of the Resources Agency and the
 Department of Finance, is authorized to administer unit land and water areas for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement, or both, and to contract with the federal government for the operation, maintenance, and replacement of unit facilities, to assume all costs of such operation, maintenance, and replacement, and to accept transfer of unit lands or facilities by lease or exchange upon such terms and conditions as will best promote the development and operation of such lands or facilities in the public interest for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement purposes, or both. Any such contract entered into by the department which affects the operation, maintenance or replacement of fish and wildlife enhancement features is subject to approval by the Department of Fish and Game.

The State of California, acting by and through the department, with the approval of the Administrator of the Resources Agency and the Department of Finance, is authorized to enter into a
 contract or contracts with the federal government to pay or repay one-half of the separable capital costs involved in the development of the recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement features, or both, at the Auburn Dam and Reservoir, Folsom Dam and Reservoir, Nimbus Dam and Lake Natomas, and County Line Dam and Reservoir, and stream areas in the immediate vicinity of these facilities, pursuant to the provisions of Public Law 89-161. The agreement for the payment or repayment of the separable capital costs shall be limited to those recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement facilities, or both, specified in the contract. Such payments or repayments may be made by any or all of the following methods: by legislative appropriation; by provision of lands, interests therein, or facilities for the unit; or by a contract or contracts for repayment, with interest, within 50 years of first use of unit recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement facilities specified in the contract or contracts. The source of
 repayment may be limited to entrance and user fees or charges collected at the unit by the department if such fees or charges dedicated to repayment are established on a basis calculated to achieve repayment and are made subject to review and renegotiation at intervals of not more than five years. If the source of repayment is so limited, revenues derived from such fees or charges shall be deposited in a special account in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury and used for the purpose of such repayment. If not so limited, the source of repayment shall be such appropriations of funds as may from time to time be made for such purpose by the Legislature.

The department shall cooperate with any local public body authorized to contract with the federal government pursuant to Public Law 89-161, including, but not limited to, the Counties of El Dorado, Placer, and Sacramento, in planning of any proposed participation with the federal government. The state may
 contract with any or all of such counties or other local public bodies for the operation, maintenance, and replacement of unit facilities, or any portion thereof, if requested by any or all such counties or other local public bodies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.7.

Pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 5094) of this division, the Administrator of the Resources Agency may indicate in writing the state’s intent to agree to administer the project land and water areas at the Marysville Dam and Reservoir Project on the Yuba River for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement, or both of these purposes, as provided in Public Law 89-72.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department consistently operate the state park system to preserve public access and provide protection of natural, cultural, and historic resources. If budget reductions necessitate changes to the continued operation of state park units, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department achieve required budget reductions by implementing efficiencies and
 increasing revenue collection, or reducing services at selected units of the state park system, and that full park closures only be considered as a last option to address required budget reductions after all other feasible alternatives, including, but not limited to, entering into operating agreements with qualified nonprofit entities and local governments have been explored.

(b) For any park unit proposed for closure on or after July 1, 2014, the department shall document and publicly disclose the methodology, rationale, and scoring system used to evaluate and select park units proposed for closure, and shall select any units proposed to be closed based on consideration of all of the following factors:

(1) The relative statewide significance of each park unit, preserving to the extent possible, parks identified in the department’s documents including “Outstanding and
 Representative Parks,” the “California State History Plan,” and the “California State Parks Survey of 1928.”

(2) The rate of visitation to each unit, to minimize impacts to visitation in the state park system. Visitation shall be measured not only based on the raw number of visitations to the unit, but also to the extent that the total capacity of the unit is used.

(3) (A) The estimated net savings from closing each unit, to maximize savings to the state park system.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “net savings” means the estimated costs of operation for the unit less the unit’s projected revenues and less the costs of maintaining the unit after it is closed.

(4) The feasibility of physically closing each unit.

(5) The existence of, or potential for, partnerships that can help support each unit, including public and nonprofit partners and concessions.

(6) Significant operational efficiencies to be gained by closing a unit.

(7) Significant and costly infrastructure deficiencies affecting key systems at each unit so that continued operation of the unit is less cost effective relative to other units.

(8) Recent or funded infrastructure investments at a unit.

(9) Necessary but unfunded capital investments at a unit.

(10) Deed restrictions and grant requirements applicable to each unit.

(11) The extent to which there are substantial dedicated funds for the support of the unit that are not appropriated from the General Fund.

(12) The extent to which the closure of a park unit would disproportionately impact one community or region of the state over another, based on existing information readily available to the department. Nothing in this paragraph is intended to require the department to prepare, or contract for the preparation of, new studies or research to obtain information or analysis not already readily available to the department with existing resources.

(13) The extent to which the closure of a park unit would limit availability of facilities within state parks that are compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and subsequent amendments to the act.

(14) The extent
 to which closure of a park unit would impair firefighter access to water resources or otherwise increase fire risk.

(15) The extent to which closure of a park unit would increase public safety hazards or impair the state’s ability to protect iconic natural and historical resources.

(c) The commission shall hold a public hearing on any park unit closures that are proposed by the department on or after July 1, 2014, and information gathered at the hearing shall be considered by the department before any final decision regarding the proposed closure of a park unit.

(d) Notwithstanding Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, a public entity or a public employee is not liable for injury or damage caused by a condition of public property located in, or injury or damage otherwise